Utah statutes.
76-3-403.   Credit for good behavior against jail sentence for misdemeanors
and certain felonies.
In any commitment for incarceration in a county jail or detention facility,
other than the Utah State Prison, the custodial authority may in its
discretion and upon good behavior of the inmate allow up to ten days credit
against the sentence to be served for every 30 days served or up to two days
credit for every ten days served when the period to be served is less than 30
days if:
(1)  the incarceration is for a misdemeanor offense, and the sentencing judge
has not entered an order to the contrary; or
(2)  the incarceration is part of a probation agreement for a felony offense,
and the sentencing district judge has not entered an order to the contrary.
